Nevada, session 83, AB400.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 289.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.030 1. A law enforcement agency shall not require any
peace officer to:
(a) Disclose the peace officer’s assets, debts, sources of income
or other financial information or make such a disclosure a condition
-
*AB400*

– 2 –
precedent to a promotion, job assignment or other personnel action
unless that information is necessary to:
(1) Determine the peace officer’s credentials for transfer to a
specialized unit;
(2) Prevent any conflict of interest which may result in any
new assignment; or
(3) Determine whether the peace officer is engaged in
unlawful activity.
(b) [Provide] Except as otherwise provided by subsection 2,
provide an oral or written attestation concerning any use of cannabis
by the peace officer that occurred before the peace officer submitted
his or her application for employment with the law enforcement
agency as a condition precedent to employment with the agency as a
peace officer.
2. A law enforcement agency may require an applicant
seeking a position of employment for which the applicant would be
authorized or required to possess or carry a firearm to provide an
oral or written attestation concerning any use of cannabis by the
applicant that occurred in the 12 months immediately preceding
the date on which the applicant submitted his or her application
for employment with the law enforcement agency as a condition
precedent to employment with the agency as a peace officer.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a law
enforcement agency from:
(a) Requiring a peace officer to provide an oral or written
attestation concerning any use of cannabis by the peace officer that
has occurred after the submission of his or her application for
employment with the law enforcement agency as a condition
precedent to employment with the agency as a peace officer; or
(b) Adopting a policy that requires a peace officer to submit to a
screening test as:
(1) A condition precedent to employment; or
(2) A condition for continued employment.
[3.] 4. As used in this section, “use of cannabis” includes the
adult use of cannabis and the medical use of cannabis.
H
-
*AB400*